Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the veterinary board of governors established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(2) "Certified animal massage therapist" means an individual who provides external manipulation or pressure of soft tissues by use of the hands, body, or device designed and limited to providing massage. Animal massage may include techniques such as stroking, percussions, compressions, friction, Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, range of motion or stretching, and fascial or connective tissue stretching, with or without the aid of superficial heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Animal massage does not include: Diagnosis, prognosis, or all treatment of diseases, deformities, defects, wounds, or injuries of animals; attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the animal's body or spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force; acupuncture involving the use of needles; or mechanical therapies that are restricted to the field of veterinary medicine. Animal massage may be performed solely for purposes of patient well-being.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[ 2016 c 41 s 20; 2007 c 70 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.